Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.110

ESD board—Members—Elections, contest of.

Any common school district board member eligible to vote for a candidate for membership on an educational service district or any candidate for the position, within ten days after the secretary to the state board of education's certification of election, may contest the election of the candidate pursuant to chapter 29A.68 RCW.

[ 2005 c 497 s 404; 1990 c 33 s 272; 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 18. Formerly RCW 28A.21.034.]

NOTES:

Intent—Part headings not law—Effective date—2005 c 497: See notes following RCW 28A.305.011.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.